Washington statutes.
RCW 44.90.075

Failure to reach agreement—Third party involvement—Expiration of agreements during negotiation.

(1) Should the parties fail to reach agreement in negotiating a collective bargaining agreement, either party may request of the commission the assistance of an impartial third party to mediate the negotiations. If a collective bargaining agreement previously negotiated under this chapter expires while negotiations are underway, the terms and conditions specified in the collective bargaining agreement remain in effect for a period not to exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement. Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement according to law.

(2) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative from agreeing to substitute, at their own expense, their own procedure for resolving impasses in collective bargaining for that provided in this section or from agreeing to utilize for the purposes of this section any other governmental or other agency or person in lieu of the commission.

(3) The commission shall bear costs for mediator services.

[ 2024 c 333 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 333: See note following RCW 44.90.025.